el: Τύπος συντονιστή: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; Ραδιόφωνο HD; NTSC; QAM; Δορυφορικά ραδιόφωνα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Imtuvo tipas: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radijas; NTSC; QAM; Palydovinis radijas; Kita
pl: Typ tunera: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Radio satelitarne; Inne
ja: チューナータイプ: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HDラジオ; NTSC; QAM; 衛星ラジオ; その他
fr: Type d’accordeur: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Radio satellite; Autre
zh-TW: 收音機類型: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; 衛星廣播; 其他
nb: Stemmertype: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-radio; NTSC; QAM; Satelittradio; Annet
zh-CN: 调音器类型: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; 高清广播; NTSC; QAM; 卫星广播; 其他
es: Tipo de sintonizador: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; Radio HD; NTSC; QAM; Radio satelital; Otros
de: Empfängertyp: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-Radio; NTSC; QAM; Satellitenradio; Sonstiges
sv: Typ av stämmare: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-radio; NTSC; QAM; Satellitradio; Övrigt
fi: Viritintyyppi: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Satelliittiradio; Muu
en: Tuner type: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Satellite radio; Other
cs: Typ tuneru: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD rádio; NTSC; QAM; Satelitní rádio; Jiné
th: ประเภทตัวปรับเสียง: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; วิทยุ HD; NTSC; QAM; วิทยุดาวเทียม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip tuner: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; Radio HD; NTSC; QAM; Radio prin satelit; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta sprejemnika: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Satelitski radio; Drugo
it: Tipo di sintonizzatore: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD Radio; NTSC; QAM; Radio satellitari; Altro
nl: Afstemmertype: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-radio; NTSC; QAM; Satellietradio; Andere
pt-BR: Tipo de sintonizador: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; Rádio HD; NTSC; QAM; Rádio satélite; Outro
ru: Тип тюнера: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-радио; NTSC; QAM; Спутниковое радио; Другой
pt-PT: Tipo de sintonizador: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD Radio; NTSC; QAM; Rádio por satélite; Outro
da: Tunertype: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD-radio; NTSC; QAM; Satellitradio; Andet
vi: Loại dụng cụ chỉnh: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; Radio HD; NTSC; QAM; Radio vệ tinh; Khác
ko: 튜너 유형: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD 라디오; NTSC; QAM; 위성 라디오; 기타
hu: Tuner típusa: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD rádió; NTSC; QAM; Műholdas rádió; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ tunera: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD rádio; NTSC; QAM; Satelitné rádio; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta štimera: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radio; NTSC; QAM; Satelitski radio; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип тунер: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD радио; NTSC; QAM; Сателитно радио; Други
tr: Ayarlayıcı Türü: AM/FM; ATSC; DAB/DAB+; HD radyo; NTSC; QAM; Uydu radyo; Diğer